District of Columbia statutes.
40-303.10

Subcontractor preferred to contractor.

If the original contractor and the persons contracting or employed under him shall both have filed notices of liens, as aforesaid, the latter shall first be satisfied out of the proceeds of sale before the original contractor, but not in excess of the amount due him, and the balance, if any, of said amount shall be paid to him.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1386, ch. 854, § 1248

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 38-112.
1973 Ed., § 38-112.